North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 11. Wastewater Systems.
§ 130A-336.
Improvement permit and authorization for wastewater system construction required.

Any proposed site for a residence, place of business, or place of public assembly in an area not served by an approved wastewater system shall be evaluated by either (i) the local health department in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to this Article
or (ii) by a professional engineer, licensed soil scientist, or licensed geologist acting within the engineer’s, soil scientist’s, or geologist’s scope of work, as applicable, and pursuant to the conditions of the engineered option
permit in

G.S. 130A-336.1

. An improvement permit issued by a local health department shall include:

For permits that are valid without expiration, a plat, or, for permits that are valid for five years, a site plan.

A description of the facility the proposed site is to serve.

The proposed wastewater system and its location.

The design wastewater flow and characteristics.

The conditions for any site modifications.

Any other information required by the rules of the Commission.

Neither the improvement permit nor the authorization for wastewater system construction shall be affected by change of ownership of the site for the wastewater system provided both the site for the wastewater system and the facility the system serves
are unchanged and remain under the ownership or control of the person owning the facility. No person shall commence or assist in the construction, location, or relocation of a residence, place of business, or place
of public assembly in an area not served by an approved wastewater system unless an improvement permit and an authorization for wastewater system construction are obtained from the local health department unless that
person is acting in accordance with the conditions and criteria of an engineered option permit pursuant to

G.S. 130A-336.1

. This requirement shall not apply to a manufactured residence exhibited for sale or stored for later sale and intended to be located at another site after sale.

The local health department shall issue an authorization for wastewater system construction authorizing work to proceed and the installation or repair of a wastewater system when it has determined after a field investigation that the system can be installed
and operated in compliance with this Article and rules adopted pursuant to this Article. This authorization for wastewater system construction shall be valid for a period equal to the period of validity of the improvement permit
and may be issued at the same time the improvement permit is issued. No person shall commence or assist in the installation, construction, or repair of a wastewater system unless an improvement permit and an authorization for wastewater
system construction have been obtained from the Department or the local health department unless that person is acting in accordance with the conditions and criteria of an engineered option permit pursuant to

G.S. 130A-336.1

. No improvement permit or authorization for wastewater system construction shall be required for maintenance of a wastewater system. The Department and the local health department may impose conditions on the issuance
of an improvement permit and an authorization for wastewater system construction.

(b1) An improvement permit or authorization for wastewater system construction issued by a local health department from January 1, 2000, to January 1, 2015, which has not been acted on and would have otherwise expired, shall remain valid until January
1, 2020, without penalty, unless there are changes in the hydraulic flows or wastewater characteristics from the original local health department evaluation. Permits are transferrable with ownership of the property. Permits
shall retain the site, soil evaluations, and construction conditions of the original permit. Site activities begun or completed pursuant to requirements from the local health department under the original permit, however, shall
not be construed to be altered conditions and shall not constitute a basis for refusal of the permit extension. The property owner may contract with a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 89F of the General Statutes as a licensed
soil scientist to conduct a site verification to determine whether the conditions of the original permit are unchanged. Written verification by the licensed soil scientist shall be accepted by the local health department, used
in lieu of verification by the local health department, and be attached to the permit.

Unless the Commission otherwise provides by rule, plans, and specifications for all wastewater systems designed for the collection, treatment, and disposal of industrial process wastewater shall be reviewed and approved by the Department prior to the
issuance of an authorization for wastewater system construction by the local health department.

If a local health department repeatedly fails to issue or deny improvement permits for conventional or accepted septic tank systems within 60 days, or within 90 days for provisional or innovative systems, after receiving completed applications for the
permits, then the Department of Health and Human Services may withhold public health funding from that local health department.

History.
1973, c. 452, s. 5; c. 476, s. 128; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 273; 1991, c. 256, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 5; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 585, s. 3; 1996, 2nd Ex.
Sess., c. 18, s. 27.31(d)-(f); 1997-443, ss. 11A.83, 11A.119(a); 2014-120, s. 40(c); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u); 2015-286, s. 4.14(g); 2017-211, s. 19; 2018-114, s. 9.

§ 130A-336.1.
Alternative process for wastewater system approvals.

Engineered Option Permit Authorized. — A professional engineer licensed under Chapter 89C of the General Statutes may, at the direction of the owner of a proposed wastewater system who wishes to utilize the engineered option permit, prepare signed and
sealed drawings, specifications, plans, and reports for the design, construction, operation, and maintenance of the wastewater system in accordance with this section and rules adopted thereunder.

Notice of Intent to Construct. — Prior to commencing or assisting in the construction, siting, or relocation of a wastewater system, the owner of a proposed wastewater system who wishes to utilize the engineered option permit, or a professional engineer
authorized as the legal representative of the owner, shall submit to the local health department with jurisdiction over the location of the proposed wastewater system a notice of intent to construct a wastewater system utilizing
the engineered permit option. The Department shall develop a common form for use as the notice of intent to construct that includes all of the following:

The owner’s name, address, e-mail address, and telephone number.

The professional engineer’s name, license number, address, e-mail address, and telephone number.

For the professional engineer, the licensed soil scientist, the licensed geologist, and any on-site wastewater contractors, proof of errors and omissions insurance coverage or other appropriate liability insurance.

A description of the facility the proposed site is to serve and any factors that would affect the wastewater load.

The type of proposed wastewater system and its location.

The design wastewater flow and characteristics.

Any proposed landscape, site, drainage, or soil modifications.

A soil evaluation that is conducted and signed and sealed by a either a licensed soil scientist or licensed geologist.

A plat, as defined in G.S. 130A-334(7a).

Completeness Review for Notice of Intent to Construct. — The local health department shall determine whether a notice of intent to construct, as required pursuant subsection (b) of this section, is complete within 15 business days after the local health
department receives the notice of intent to construct. A determination of completeness means that the notice of intent to construct includes all of the required components. If the local health department determines that the notice
of intent to construct is incomplete, the department shall notify the owner or the professional engineer of the components needed to complete the notice. The owner or professional engineer may submit additional information to the
department to cure the deficiencies in the notice. The local health department shall make a final determination as to whether the notice of intent to construct is complete within 10 business days after the department receives the
additional information from the owner or professional engineer. If the department fails to act within any time period set out in this subsection, the owner or professional engineer may treat the failure to act as a determination
of completeness.

Submission of Notice of Intent to Construct to Department for Certain Systems. — Prior to commencing in the construction, siting, or relocation of a wastewater system designed (i) for the collection, treatment, and disposal of industrial process wastewater
or (ii) to treat greater than 3,000 gallons per day, the owner of a proposed wastewater system who wishes to utilize the engineered option permit, or a professional engineer authorized as the legal representative of the owner,
shall provide to the Department a duplicate copy of the notice of intent to construct submitted to the local health department required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

Site Design, Construction, and Activities. —

The professional engineer designing the proposed wastewater system shall use recognized principles and practices of engineering and applicable rules of the Commission in the calculations and design of the wastewater system. The investigations and findings
of the professional engineer shall include, at a minimum, the information required in rules adopted by the Commission pursuant to

G.S. 130A-335(e)

. The professional engineer may, at the engineer’s discretion, employ pretreatment technologies not yet approved in this State.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 130A-335(a1)

, the owner of the proposed wastewater system shall employ a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 89F of the General Statutes as a licensed soil scientist to conduct soil and site evaluations and, as applicable,
a person licensed pursuant to Chapter 89E of the General Statutes as a licensed geologist to evaluate geologic and hydrogeologic conditions.

The professional engineer designing the proposed wastewater system:

Shall be responsible for the engineer’s scope of work, including all aspects of the design and any drawings, specifications, plans, or reports that are signed and sealed by the professional engineer.

Shall prepare a signed and sealed statement of special inspections that includes the following items:

The materials, systems, components, and work subject to special inspection or testing.

The type and extent of each special inspection and each test.

The frequency of each type of special inspection. For purposes of this sub-sub-subdivision, frequency of special inspections shall be required on either a continuous or periodic basis. Continuous special inspections mean the full-time observation of work
requiring special inspection by an approved special inspector who is present in the area where the work is performed. Periodic special inspections mean the part-time or intermittent observation of work requiring
a special inspection by an approved special inspector who is present in the area where the work is or has been performed and at the completion of the work.

May assist the owner of the proposed wastewater system with the selection of an on-site wastewater system contractor certified pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes.

An on-site wastewater system contractor, licensed pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes, who is employed by the owner of the wastewater system, shall:

Be responsible for all aspects of the construction and installation of the wastewater system or components of the wastewater system, including adherence to the design, specifications, and any special inspections that are prepared, signed, and sealed by
the professional engineer in accordance with all the applicable provisions of this section.

Submit a signed and dated statement of responsibility to the owner of the wastewater system, prior to the commencement of work, that contains acknowledgement and awareness of the requirements in the professional engineer’s statement of special inspections.

Where the professional engineer’s designs, plans, and specifications call for the installation of a conventional wastewater system, such designs, plans, and specifications shall allow for the installation of an accepted system in lieu of a conventional
system in accordance with the accepted system approval.

In addition to the requirements of this section, the owner, the professional engineer designing the proposed wastewater system, and any on-site wastewater system contractors employed to construct or install the wastewater system shall comply with applicable
federal, State, and local laws, regulations, rules, and ordinances.

No Public Liability. — The Department, the Department’s authorized agents, or local health departments shall have no liability for wastewater systems designed, constructed, and installed pursuant to a engineered option permit.

Inspections, Construction Observations, and Reports. —

Site visits. — The local health department may, at any time, conduct a site visit of the wastewater system.

Construction observations. — The professional engineer who designed the wastewater system shall make periodic visits to the site, at intervals appropriate to the stage of construction, to observe the progress and quality of the construction and to determine,
generally, if the construction is proceeding in accordance with the engineer’s plans and specifications.

Special inspections. — The owner of the proposed wastewater system shall employ one or more approved special inspectors to conduct special inspections during the construction of the wastewater system. The professional engineer who designed the wastewater
system, or the engineer’s personnel, may function as an approved agency to conduct special inspections required by this subdivision. The professional engineer’s personnel shall only operate as an approved agency for special
inspections if the personnel can demonstrate competence and relevant experience or training. For purposes of this subdivision, experience or training shall be considered relevant when the documented experience or training
is related in complexity to the same type of special inspection activities for projects of similar complexity and material qualities.

Inspection reports. — Approved special inspectors shall maintain and furnish all inspection records to the professional engineer who designed the wastewater system. The records shall indicate whether the work inspected was completed in conformance with
the engineer’s design and specifications. Any discrepancies identified between the completed work and the engineer’s design shall be brought to the immediate attention of the on-site wastewater system contractor for correction.
If discrepancies are not corrected, they shall be brought to the attention of the professional engineer who designed the wastewater system prior to completion of work. A final inspection report documenting the required
special inspections and the correction of any identified discrepancies shall be provided to the professional engineer and the owner of the wastewater system for review at the post-construction conference required pursuant
to subsection (j) of this section.

Local Authority. — This section shall not relieve the owner or operator of a wastewater system from complying with any and all modifications or additions to rules adopted by a local health department to protect public health pursuant to

G.S. 130A-335(c)

that are required at the time the owner or operator submits the notice of intent to construct pursuant to G.S. 130A-336.1(b). The local health department shall notify the owner or operator of the wastewater system
of any issues of compliance related to such modifications or additions.

Operations and Management. —

The professional engineer designing the wastewater system shall establish a written operations and management program based on the size and complexity of the wastewater system and shall provide the program to the owner.

The owner shall enter into a contract with a water pollution control system operator certified pursuant to Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes and who is selected from the list of certified operators maintained by the Division of
Water Resources in the Department of Environment and Natural Resources for operation and maintenance of the wastewater system in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission.

The owner of the wastewater system shall be responsible for the continued adherence to the operations and management program established by the professional engineer pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Post-Construction Conference. — The professional engineer designing the wastewater system shall hold a post-construction conference with the owner of the wastewater system; the licensed soil scientist or licensed geologist who performed the soils evaluation
for the wastewater system; the on-site wastewater system contractor, certified pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes, who installed the wastewater system; the certified operator of the wastewater system,
if any; and representatives from the local health department and, as applicable, the Department. The post-construction conference shall include start-up of the wastewater system and any required verification of system design or
system components. The post-construction conference required by this subsection may be waived for Type I, II, and III wastewater systems, as listed in 15A NCAC 18A.1961 Table V(a), upon written request by the professional engineer
and written approval by the owner of the wastewater system.

Required Documentation. —

At the completion of the post-construction conference conducted pursuant to subsection (j) of this section, the professional engineer who designed the wastewater system shall deliver to the owner signed, sealed, and dated copies of the engineer’s report,
which, for purposes of this subsection, shall include the following:

The evaluation of soil conditions and site features as prepared by either the licensed soil scientist or licensed geologist.

The drawings, specifications, plans, and reports of the wastewater system, including the statement of special inspections required pursuant to G.S. 130A-336.1(e)(3); the on-site wastewater system contractor’s signed statement of responsibility required
pursuant to G.S. 130A-336.1(e)(4); records of all special inspections; and the final inspection report documenting the correction of any identified discrepancies required pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.

The operator’s management program manual that includes a copy of the contract with the certified water pollution control system operator required pursuant to subsection (i) of this section.

Any reports and findings related to the design and installation of the wastewater system.

Upon reviewing the professional engineer’s report, the owner of the wastewater system shall sign and notarize the report as having been received.

Reporting Requirements. —

The owner of the wastewater system shall submit the following to the local health department:

A copy of the professional engineer’s report required pursuant to G.S. 130A-336.1(k)(1).

A copy of the operations and management program.

The fee required pursuant to subsection (n) of this section.

A notarized letter that documents the owner’s acceptance of the system from the professional engineer.

The owner of any wastewater system that is subject to subsection (d) of this section shall deliver to the Department copies of the engineer’s report, as described G.S. 130A-336.1(k)(1).

Authorization to Operate. — Within 15 business days of receipt of the documents and fees required pursuant to G.S. 130A-336.1(l)(1), the local health department shall issue the owner a letter of confirmation that states the documents and information
contained therein have been received and that the wastewater system may operate in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission.

Fees. — The local health department may assess a fee for the engineered option permit of up to thirty percent (30%) of the cumulative total of the fees the department has established to obtain an improvement permit, an authorization to construct, and
an operations permit for wastewater systems under its jurisdiction. The fee shall only be used by the department in support of its work pursuant to this section to conduct site inspections; support the department’s staff participation
at post-construction conference meetings; and archive the engineered permit with the county register of deeds or other recordation of the wastewater system as required.

Change in System Ownership. — A wastewater system authorized pursuant to this section shall not be affected by change in ownership of the site for the wastewater system, provided both the site for the wastewater system and the facility the system serves
are unchanged and remain under the ownership or control of the person owning the facility.

Remedies. — Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or any other provision of law, owners; operators; professional engineers who utilize the engineered option permit, who prepare drawings, specifications, plans, and reports; licensed soil
scientists; licensed geologists; and on-site wastewater system contractors employed for the construction or installation of the wastewater system shall be subject to the provisions and remedies provided to the Department and local
health departments pursuant to Article 1 of this Chapter.

Rule Making. — The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Reports. — The Department shall report to the Environmental Review Commission and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on or before January 1, 2017, and annually thereafter, on the implementation and effectiveness of
this section. For the report due on or before January 1, 2017, the Department shall specifically study (i) whether the engineered option permit resulted in a reduction in the length of time improvement permits or authorizations
to construct are pending; (ii) whether the engineered option permit resulted in increased system failures or other adverse impacts; (iii) if the engineered option permit resulted in new or increased environmental or public health
impacts; (iv) an amount of errors and omissions insurance or other liability sufficient for covering professional engineers, licensed soil scientists, licensed geologists, and contractors who employ the engineered option permit;
and (v) the fees charged by local health departments to administer the engineered option permit pursuant to subsection (n) of this section. The Department may include recommendations, including any legislative proposals, in its
reports to the Commission and Committee.

History.
2015-286, s. 4.14(c); 2017-209, s. 18(b); 2021-117, s. 12A.

§ 130A-336.2.
Alternative wastewater system approvals for nonengineered systems.

Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator. — An individual licensed as a soil scientist pursuant to Chapter 89F of the General Statutes and further certified under conditions developed and administered by the North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractors
and Inspectors Certification Board may, at the direction of the owner of a proposed wastewater system, prepare signed and sealed soil and site evaluations, specifications, plans, and reports for the site layout, construction, operation,
and maintenance of a wastewater system in accordance with this section and rules adopted pursuant to this section. An Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall not perform any of the functions performed by a professional engineer
for engineered wastewater systems described in

G.S. 130A-336.1

.

Notice of Intent to Construct. — Prior to commencing or assisting in the construction, siting, relocation, or repair of a wastewater system, the owner of a proposed wastewater system who wishes to use an Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall
submit a notice of intent to construct a wastewater system using an Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator to the local health department with jurisdiction over the location of the proposed wastewater system. The Department of
Health and Human Services shall develop a common form for use as a notice of intent to construct that includes all of the following:

The owner’s name, e-mail address, mailing address, and phone number.

The Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator’s name, certification number, mailing address, e-mail address, and telephone number.

The physical location of proposed site.

Proof of errors and omissions, liability, or other insurance adequate for the proposed wastewater system.

A description of the facility the proposed site is to serve and any factors that would affect the wastewater load.

The type of wastewater system proposed.

The estimated wastewater flow and wastewater characteristics.

Any proposed landscape, site, drainage, or soil modifications.

An evaluation of soil conditions and site features that is conducted and signed and sealed by a licensed soil scientist or for geologic or hydrogeologic conditions by a licensed geologist.

A plat, as defined in G.S. 130A-334(7a), or a site plan, as defined in G.S. 130A-334(13a).

Completeness Review for Notice of Intent to Construct. — The local health department shall determine whether the notice of intent to construct required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section is complete within five business days after receiving the
notice of intent to construct. A determination of completeness means that the notice of intent to construct includes all of the required components. If the local health department determines that the notice of intent to construct
is incomplete, the local health department shall notify the owner and list the information needed to complete the notice. The owner may then submit additional information to the local health department to cure the deficiencies
in the initial notice. The local health department shall make a final determination as to whether the notice of intent to construct is complete within five business days after the department receives the additional information.
If the local health department fails to act within any time period set out in this subsection, the owner may treat the failure to act as a determination of completeness. The owner shall be able to apply for the building permit
for the project upon the decision of completeness of the notice of intent by the local health department or if the local health department fails to act within the five business day time period.

Soil and Site Evaluation, Construction, and Activities. —

The Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall use standards incorporated in recognized soil and siting practices in North Carolina. The evaluation and findings shall include, at a minimum, the information required in rules adopted by the Commission
pursuant to

G.S. 130A-335(e)

. An Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall not form a direct business relationship with any technology that may result in a conflict of interest.

The Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall prepare a signed and sealed statement of special inspections that includes the following items:

The materials, systems, components, and work subject to special inspections and testing.

The type, frequency, and extent of each special inspection and each test. For the purposes of this subdivision, “special inspection” means any continuous or intermittent inspection or visitation performed by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator
at the construction site on behalf of the owner.

The Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall assist the owner in the selection of an on-site wastewater system contractor who shall be under contractual obligation to the owner of the system and have sufficient errors and omissions, liability, or
other insurance for the system constructed.

The Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator may assist in the construction, siting, relocation, or repair of any wastewater system described in

G.S. 130A-343

.

Where the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator’s designs, plans, and specifications call for the installation of a conventional wastewater system, those designs, plans, and specifications shall allow for the installation of an Accepted system in lieu
of a conventional system in accordance with the Accepted system approval.

Responsibilities of the On-Site Wastewater System Contractor. — The on-site wastewater system contractor retained by the site owner shall do all of the following:

Be certified pursuant to Article 5 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes.

Be responsible for all aspects of the construction and installation of the wastewater system and its components, including adherence to specifications and any special inspections that are prepared, signed, and sealed by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater
Evaluator.

Submit a signed and dated statement of responsibility to the owner of the wastewater system, prior to commencement of work, that contains acknowledgement of the requirements of the on-site wastewater system specified by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater
Evaluator.

No Public Liability. — The Department, the Department’s authorized agents, and local health departments shall have no liability for wastewater systems developed by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator; however, nothing in this section shall relieve
the Department, the Department’s authorized agents, and local health departments from any of their other obligations under State law or administrative rule.

Inspections, Construction Observations, and Reports. —

A local health department may, at any time, conduct a site visit of the wastewater system.

An Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall make periodic visits to the site to observe the progress and quality of the construction.

An Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator may employ independent inspectors to observe and direct the construction of the wastewater system. Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluators shall be liable for any errors or omissions made by independent inspectors
they employ or contract with.

All construction and inspection reports shall be signed by the authorized inspector or Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator. Copies shall be furnished to the owner and the certified contractor and shall be included in the submittal package to the local
health department.

Local Authority. — Nothing in this section shall relieve the owner of the wastewater system from complying with all rules adopted by a local health department pursuant to

G.S. 130A-335(c)

that are in effect at the time the owner submits the notice of intent to construct described in subsection (b) of this section. The local health department shall notify the owner of the wastewater system of any issues
of compliance related to such modifications or additions.

Operation and Management. —

An Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall establish a written operation and management program based on the rules established for similar wastewater systems and shall provide this information to the owner of the system.

If necessary to comply with rules adopted by the Commission, the owner shall enter into a contract with a water pollution control system operator certified pursuant to Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 90A of the General Statutes.

The owner shall be responsible for the continued adherence to the operations and management program established by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Post-Construction Conference. — The Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall hold a post-construction conference with the owner, the certified contractor, the certified water pollution control system operator, if any, and representatives from the
local health department. The post-construction conference shall include start-up and any required verification of system components.

Required Documents. — At the post-construction conference, the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator shall provide the owner with the following documents:

A signed and sealed copy of reports on soil conditions and site features, layouts, drawings, specifications, justification on any proposed design daily flow reductions, and any special inspection reports or corrections made during the construction of
the system.

The owner’s operation and management program established for the specific wastewater system under subdivision (1) of subsection (i) of this section.

Any reports and findings related to the evaluation, siting, and construction of the wastewater system.

After reviewing the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator’s report, the owner shall sign and notarize a document confirming acceptance and receipt of the report. The owner shall then submit the following to the local health department:

A copy of the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator’s report.

A copy of the operations and management program established for the system by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator.

The fee established pursuant to subsection (n) of this section.

A notarized letter that documents the owner’s acceptance of the system.

Authorization to Operate. — Within five business days of receipt of the required documents and fees described in subsection (l) of this section, the local health department shall issue the owner an authorization to operate confirming all the requirements
of this section have been met and all rules adopted by the Commission pertaining to nonengineered on-site wastewater systems have been complied with.

Fees. — The local health department may assess a fee for the system developed by the Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluator of up to thirty percent (30%) of the cumulative total of the fees established for similar systems permitted by the local health
department. The fee shall only be used by the local health department in support of its work pursuant to duties established by this section.

Change in System Ownership. — A wastewater system authorized pursuant to this section shall not be affected by change of ownership of the site for the wastewater system, provided both the site for the wastewater system and the type of facility the system
serves are unchanged.

Remedies. — Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, Authorized On-Site Wastewater Evaluators, certified contractors described in subsection (e) of this section, and certified water pollution control systems operators described in
subdivision (2) of subsection (i) of this section shall be subject only to the disciplinary authority of their individual certifying boards.

Rule Making. —

The Commission shall have the power to adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the North Carolina On-Site Wastewater Contractors and Inspectors Certification Board shall have the exclusive authority to promulgate rules regarding certification of Authorized On-Site Wastewater
Evaluators where review and seal of a professional engineer is not necessary pursuant to this section.

Reports. — The Department shall report to the Environmental Review Commission and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services by January 1, 2020, and annually thereafter, on the program established under this section. The Department
shall specifically include the efficiency and effectiveness of the program developed under this section and whether the program aided in reducing the length of time in issuing permits. The Department shall obtain activity reports
from the local health departments showing the wastewater systems developed under this section. The annual report shall include any suggestions for the improvement of this section, including adequate and appropriate insurance coverage,
operator reporting requirements, or fee allowance.

History.
2019-151, s. 14.

§ 130A-337.
Inspection; operation permit required.

No system of wastewater collection, treatment and disposal shall be covered or placed into use by any person until an inspection by the local health department has determined that the system has been installed or repaired in accordance with any conditions
of the improvement permit, the rules, and this Article.

Upon determining that the system is properly installed or repaired and that the system is capable of being operated in accordance with the conditions of the improvement permit, the rules, this Article and any conditions to be imposed in the operation
permit, as applicable, the local health department shall issue an operation permit authorizing the residence, place of business or place of public assembly to be occupied and for the system to be placed into use or reuse.

Upon determination that an existing wastewater system has a valid operation permit and is operating properly in a manufactured home park, the local health department shall issue authorization in writing for a manufactured home to be connected to the existing
system and to be occupied. Notwithstanding

G.S. 130A-336

, an improvement permit is not required for the connection of a manufactured home to an existing system with a valid operation permit in a manufactured home park.

No person shall occupy a residence, place of business or place of public assembly, or place a wastewater system into use or reuse for a residence, place of business or place of public assembly until an operation permit has been issued or authorization
has been obtained pursuant to G.S. 130A-337(c).

History.
1973, c. 452, s. 6; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1985, c. 487, s. 9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 944, s. 6; 1995, c. 285, s. 1.

§ 130A-338.
Authorization for wastewater system construction required before other permits to be issued.

Where construction, location or relocation is proposed to be done upon a residence, place of business or place of public assembly, no permit required for electrical, plumbing, heating, air conditioning or other construction, location or relocation activity
under any provision of general or special law shall be issued until an authorization for wastewater system construction has been issued under

G.S. 130A-336

, or authorization has been obtained under G.S. 130A-337(c), or a decision on the completeness of the notice of intent to construct is made by the local health department pursuant to

G.S. 130A-336

.1(c).

History.
1973, c. 452, s. 7; 1981, c. 949, s. 3; 1983, c. 891, s. 2; 1995, c. 285, s. 1; 2015-286, s. 4.14(d).